California statutes. Education Code
 purposes of establishing a dual admissions program pursuant to this section, the university may establish a, or use an existing, university equivalent to an associate degree for transfer in lieu of establishing a dual admissions program that relies upon participating students’ completion of an associate degree for transfer. If the university establishes a university equivalent to an associate degree for transfer, or uses an existing university equivalent to an associate degree for transfer, the university shall identify the following for prospective dual admissions students:

(1) Courses that overlap between the existing associate degree for transfer pathway and its university equivalent pathway.

(2) Courses that do not overlap between the existing associate degree for transfer pathway and its university equivalent pathway.

(e) To the extent feasible, the university is requested to provide each student who is offered the opportunity to enter into a dual admissions agreement with a provisional financial aid letter indicating the financial aid package the student may receive upon transfer to the university. The letter shall include federal, state, and institutional-based financial aid for which the student may qualify. If providing this information, the university shall clearly indicate that the financial aid package is subject to change based on updated financial information provided on the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) or the California Dream Act application, as applicable, and potential changes in rules governing the provision of federal, state, and institutional-based financial aid.

(f) (1) In evaluating applications for dual admissions, the university shall only consider applicants who meet all of the
 following criteria:

(A) The applicant is a first-time freshman applicant who will meet the university’s admissions eligibility criteria only upon completion of transfer requirements at a California community college.

(B) The applicant provides supporting information regarding the applicant’s inability to meet freshman admissions eligibility criteria due to limitations in the high school curriculum offered or personal or financial hardship. For purposes of this subparagraph, supporting information may include, but is not necessarily limited to, a letter from a counselor or administrator at the applicant’s high school.

(C) The applicant plans to complete either of the following:

(i) An associate degree for transfer at a California community college or a
 university equivalent established pursuant to subdivision (d).

(ii) Another established course of study for transfer at a California community college.

(2) The university shall prioritize offers of dual admissions agreements for students who plan to complete an associate degree for transfer at a California community college.

(g) (1) On or before April 1, 2026, the university shall submit a progress report to the Department of Finance and the Legislature. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information for each participating university campus:

(A) The number and names of community colleges that partner with the university campus on a dual admission program.

(B) A description of the support services the community college and university campus partners each are providing to dual admission students.

(C) The number of students who applied, were admitted, filed a statement of intent to register, and enrolled at each university campus pursuant to a dual admission program, disaggregated by freshman eligibility, community college of attendance, and the race, ethnicity, gender, and, as applicable, federal Pell Grant or AB 540 status of these students.

(D) For Fall 2023, 2024, and 2025, the breakdown of all transfer applicants, admits, students who submitted an intent to register, and students who enrolled by community college of attendance, race, ethnicity, gender, and, as applicable, federal Pell Grant or AB 540 status. The universities can satisfy this requirement through any
 existing public reporting, where applicable.

(2) The report to be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 18.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Student Transfer Achievement Reform Act [66745. - 66749.9.]

66745.

This article shall be known, and may be cited as the Student Transfer Achievement Reform Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 428, Sec. 2.   (SB 1440)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

66746.

(a) Commencing with the fall term of the 2011–12 academic year, a student who earns an associate degree for transfer granted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be deemed eligible for transfer into a California State University baccalaureate program when the student meets both of the following requirements:

(1) Completion of 60 semester units or 90 quarter units that are eligible for transfer to the California State University, including both of the following:

(A) Commencing in the fall term of the 2025–26 academic year, the California General Education Transfer Curriculum. A student who is placed on the Intersegmental General Education Transfer Curriculum (IGETC) or the California State University
 General Education-Breadth Requirements before the fall term of the 2025–26 academic year and completes the pattern with appropriate certification shall be deemed to meet the requirements of this subparagraph.

(B) A minimum of 18 semester units or 27 quarter units in a major or area of emphasis, as determined by the community college district and meeting the requirements of an approved transfer model curriculum.

(2) Obtainment of a minimum grade point average of 2.0.

(b) (1) (A) As a condition of receipt of state apportionment funds, a community college district shall develop and grant associate degrees for transfer that meet the requirements of subdivision (a). A community college district shall not impose any requirements in addition to the requirements of this section,
 including any local college or district requirements, for a student to be eligible for the associate degree for transfer and subsequent admission to the California State University pursuant to Section 66747.

(B) Before the commencement of the 2015–16 academic year, a community college shall create an associate degree for transfer in the major and area of emphasis offered by that college for any approved transfer model curriculum finalized before the commencement of the 2013–14 academic year.

(C) A community college shall create an associate degree for transfer in every major and area of emphasis offered by that college for any approved transfer model curriculum approved subsequent to the commencement of the 2013–14 academic year within 18 months of the approval of the transfer model curriculum.

(D) Before the
 commencement of the 2015–16 academic year, there shall be the development of at least two transfer model curricula in areas of emphasis and, before the commencement of the 2016–17 academic year, there shall be the development of at least two additional transfer model curricula in areas of emphasis.

(2) The condition of receipt of state apportionment funding contained in paragraph (1) shall become inoperative if, by December 31, 2010, each of the state’s 72 community college districts has submitted to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, for transmission to the Director of Finance, a signed certification waiving, as a local agency request within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 6 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, any claim of reimbursement related to the implementation of this article.

(c) A community
 college district is encouraged to consider the local articulation agreements and other work between the respective faculties from the affected community college and California State University campuses in implementing the requirements of this section.

(d) Community colleges are encouraged to facilitate the acceptance of credits earned at other community colleges toward the associate degree for transfer pursuant to this section.

(e) This section shall not preclude enrollment in nontransferable student success courses in preparation for obtaining the associate degree. Pretransfer noncollegiate level coursework and nontransferable student success courses shall not be counted as part of the transferable units required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 74, Sec. 4.   (SB 619)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

66747.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 66201), the California State University shall guarantee admission with junior status to any community college student who meets all of the requirements of Section 66746, with admission to a program or major and concentration, as applicable, that meets either of the following:

(A) Is similar to the student’s community college transfer model curriculum-aligned associate degree for transfer, as determined by the California State University campus to which the student is admitted.

(B) May be completed with 60 semester units of study
 beyond the community college transfer model curriculum-aligned associate degree for transfer, with completion ability determined by the California State University campus to which the student is admitted.

(2) Admission to the California State University, as provided under this article, does not guarantee admission for a specific major or campus.

(3) Notwithstanding Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 66201), the California State University shall grant a student priority admission to his or her local California State University campus and to a program or major and concentration that is similar to the student’s community college transfer model curriculum-aligned associate degree for transfer, as determined by the California State University campus to which the student is admitted.

(4) A California State University campus shall accept transfer model curriculum-aligned associate degrees for transfer in every major and concentration offered by that California State University campus that meets the requirements of paragraph (1). A California State University campus shall additionally make every effort to accept transfer model curriculum-aligned associate degrees for
 transfer in each of the California State University concentrations.

(5) As used in this section, a “concentration”
 is an area of specialization within a major degree program.

(b) A student admitted under this article shall receive priority over all other community college transfer students, in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 66202, excluding community college students who have entered into a transfer agreement between a community college and the California State University prior to the fall term of the 2012–13 academic year. A student admitted pursuant to this article shall have met the requirements of an approved transfer agreement consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 66202.

(c) The California State University shall develop an admissions redirection process for students admitted under this article who apply for admission to the California State University, but are
 not accepted into the California State University campuses specifically applied to. This process shall be aligned with the guaranteed admission into the California State University system under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 720, Sec. 3.   (SB 440)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

66748.

(a) The California State University may require a student transferring pursuant to this article to take additional courses at the California State University so long as the student is not required to take any more than 60 additional semester units or 90 quarter units at the California State University for majors requiring 120 semester units or 180 quarter units. Specified high unit majors shall be exempt from this subdivision upon agreement by the Chancellors of the California State University and the California Community Colleges and their respective academic senates.

(b) Community college transfer units shall not be applicable to upper division requirements at the California State University, unless
 agreed upon by the local Academic Senates of the California State University and the California Community Colleges and the transferred units do not exceed the required 60 semester units or 90 quarter units required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 66746.

(c) The California State University shall not require students transferring pursuant to this article to repeat courses that are similar to those taken at the community college that counted toward the associate degree for transfer granted pursuant to Section 66746.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 428, Sec. 2.   (SB 1440)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

66748.5.

The California Community Colleges and the California State University, in consultation with students, faculty, student service administrators, the State Department of Education, the California Education Round Table, and other key stakeholders, shall develop a student-centered communication and marketing strategy in order to increase the visibility of the associate degree for transfer pathway for all students in California that includes, but is not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(a) Outreach to high schools in accordance with existing high school outreach programs and activities performed by the colleges and
 universities.

(b) Information on the pathway prominently displayed in all community college counseling offices and transfer centers.

(c) Associate degree for transfer pathway information provided to all first-year community college students developing an education plan to aid them in making informed educational choices.

(d) Targeted outreach to first-year students through campus orientations and student support services programs offered by the campus that may include, but are not necessarily limited to, Federal TRIO Programs,
 First-Generation Experience, MESA, and Puente.

(e) Information on the pathway prominently displayed in community college course catalogs.

(f) Information
 on the pathway prominently displayed on the Internet Web sites of each community college, each campus of the California State University, and on the CaliforniaColleges.edu Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 720, Sec. 4.   (SB 440)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

66749.

(a) The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall review and report to the Assembly Committee on Higher Education, the Senate Committee on Education, and the respective education finance budget subcommittees of the Assembly and the Senate in the spring of 2012, an update on the implementation of this article.

(b) The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall also review and report to the Assembly Committee on Higher Education, the Senate Committee on Education, and the respective education finance budget subcommittees of the Assembly and the Senate, within four years of implementation of this article, on both of the following:

(1) The outcomes of
 implementation of this article, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The number and percentage of community college students who transferred to the California State University and earned an associate degree for transfer pursuant to this article.

(B) The average amount of time and units it takes a community college student earning an associate degree for transfer pursuant to this article to transfer to and graduate from the California State University, as compared to the average amount of time and units it took community college transfer students prior to enactment of this article, and compared to students using other transfer processes available.

(C) Student progression and completion rates.

(D) Other relevant indicators of student
 success.

(E) The degree to which the requirements for an associate degree for transfer take into account existing articulation agreements and the degree to which community colleges facilitate the acceptance of credits between community college districts, as outlined in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 66746.

(F) It is the intent of the Legislature that student outcome data provided under this subdivision include the degree to which the California State University was able to accommodate students admitted under this article to a campus of their choice and a major that is similar to their community college major.

(2) Recommendations for statutory changes necessary to facilitate the goal of a clear and transparent transfer process, including whether this article should be made applicable to students transferring from
 community colleges to the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 428, Sec. 2.   (SB 1440)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

66749.6.

(a) (1) An independent institution of higher education that chooses to accept an associate degree for transfer does not guarantee admission to a particular campus or program.

(2) An independent institution of higher education that chooses to accept an associate degree for transfer, shall guarantee admission with junior status to a community college student who meets all of the requirements of Section 66746, with admission to a program or major and concentration, as applicable, that meets either of the following:

(A) Is similar to the student’s community college transfer model curriculum-aligned associate degree for transfer, as determined by the independent institution of higher
 education to which the student is admitted.

(B) May be completed with not more than 68 additional semester units for majors at institutions requiring 128 semester units or not more than 102 quarter units at institutions requiring 192 quarter units for a degree. An independent institution of higher education admitting a community college student with an associate degree for transfer may require the student to take additional courses at the institution as long as the student is not required to take any more than the additional semester units or quarter units specified in this subparagraph. High unit majors and additional campus-specific courses or requirements that an institution requires for graduation by all undergraduate students, and that would not otherwise be considered an educational requirement at a public institution, shall be exempt from this subparagraph.

(b) Community
 college transfer units shall not be applicable to upper division requirements at an independent institution of higher education unless agreed upon by the local academic senates of the independent institution of higher education and the California Community Colleges, and the transferred units do not exceed the required 68 semester units or 102 quarter units, pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) An independent institution of higher education shall not require students transferring pursuant to this article to repeat courses that are similar to those taken at the community college that counted toward the associate degree for transfer.

(d) Discussions concerning the associate degree for transfer program, including the development of new majors, shall include participation by the association representing the largest number of independent institutions of
 higher education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 3.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

66749.7.

The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges and those independent institutions of higher education that choose to commit to accept a student with an associate degree for transfer, in consultation with students, faculty, student service administrators, the State Department of Education, the California Education Round Table, and other key stakeholders, shall develop a student-centered communication and marketing strategy in order to increase the visibility of the associate degree for transfer pathway for all students in California that may include, but is not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(a) Outreach to high schools relative to the associate degree for transfer pathway that build upon existing high school outreach programs and activities performed by the
 California State University and the University of California.

(b) Pathway information that may be prominently displayed in all community college counseling offices and transfer centers.

(c) Pathway information that may be provided to all first-year community college students developing an education plan to aid them in making informed educational choices.

(d) Targeted outreach on the pathway that may be provided to first-year community college students through campus orientations and student support services programs offered by the campus that may include, but are not necessarily limited to, Federal TRIO Programs, First-Generation Experience, MESA, and Puente.

(e) Information on the pathway that may be prominently displayed in community college course
 catalogs.

(f) Information on the pathway that may be prominently displayed on the internet website of each community college and independent institution of higher education that chooses to commit to accept a student with an associate degree for transfer, and on the California Colleges internet website, californiacolleges.edu.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 4.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

66749.8.

(a) (1) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Student Transfer Achievement Reform Act of 2021.

(2) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(A) “ADT” means associate degree for transfer.

(B) “Committee” means the Associate Degree for Transfer Intersegmental Implementation Committee established in subdivision (b).

(C) “Four-year postsecondary educational institution” means a campus of the University of California or California State University or
 an independent institution of higher education defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66010.

(D) “STEM” means science, technology, engineering, and mathematics.

(b) The Associate Degree for Transfer Intersegmental Implementation Committee is hereby established for the following purposes:

(1) To serve as the primary entity charged with the oversight of the associate degree for transfer for the sole purpose of strengthening the pathway for students and to ensure it becomes the primary transfer pathway in California between campuses of the California Community Colleges and the University of California, the California State University, and participating independent institutions of higher education defined in subdivision
 (b) of Section 66010, so that more students can avail themselves of the pathway’s benefits. The oversight shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Ensuring a reduction in the number of excess units accumulated by California Community College students before transferring to four-year postsecondary educational institutions.

(B) Eliminating repetition of courses at four-year postsecondary educational institutions taken by California Community College students who successfully transfer into four-year postsecondary educational institutions.

(C) Increasing the number of California Community College students who transfer into a four-year postsecondary educational institution through an ADT
 pathway.

(2) To enhance coordination and communication between four-year postsecondary educational institutions and the California Community Colleges by providing a venue by which they can regularly meet and address issues that are impeding the purpose described in paragraph (1).

(3) To provide the Legislature and the Governor with recommendations to support the purpose described in paragraph (1).

(c) Meetings of the committee are subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act established under Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) (1) The committee shall
 be convened by a third-party planning facilitator. The third-party planning facilitator shall perform all of the following duties:

(A) Provide facilitation and staff support to the committee.

(B) Develop written reports of the committee’s recommendations and progress pursuant to subdivisions (g) and (h).

(C) Facilitate advisory groups as needed to support the committee’s goals.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the Office of Planning and Research may enter into an exclusive or nonexclusive contract with a third-party planning facilitator on a bid or negotiated basis. A contract entered into or amended pursuant to this paragraph shall be exempt from
 Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(3) The Office of Planning and Research shall report to the Department of Finance and relevant subcommittees of the Legislature on a contract awarded pursuant to paragraph (2) within 30 days of awarding the contract. The report shall include information on funding amounts provided to the contractor.

(e) (1) The membership of the committee shall reflect its intersegmental function by including a cross-section of the stakeholders who will be needed to
 fulfill the committee’s responsibilities.

(2) (A) Each of the following entities shall designate, on or before March 1, 2022, one representative to serve on the committee:

(i) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(ii) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University.

(iii) The office of the President of the University of California.

(iv) The Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities.

(v) The State Department of Education.

(vi) The Student Senate for the California Community Colleges.

(vii) The California State Student Association.

(viii) The University of California Student Association.

(ix) The Academic Senate for the California Community Colleges.

(x) The Academic Senate of the California State University.

(xi) The Academic Senate of the University of California.

(B) Designating entities described in subparagraph (A) shall fill vacancies when their representative member positions on the committee are
 vacant.

(3) (A) On or before March 1, 2022, five members of the committee shall be appointed as follows:

(i) The Senate Committee on Rules shall appoint one member from the workforce sector with expertise in the fields of science, technology, engineering, or mathematics.

(ii) The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint one member with a background in higher education research that includes scholarship on student transfer issues in the state.

(iii) The Lieutenant Governor shall appoint one member from an educational equity and social justice organization.

(iv) The Governor shall
 appoint one member from an educational equity and social justice organization.

(v) The Governor shall appoint one member who is a California community college student.

(B) Appointing entities described in subparagraph (A) shall fill vacancies when their appointed member positions on the committee are vacant.

(C) Members appointed pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall serve at the pleasure of their respective appointing entities.

(4) The first chair of the committee shall be the representative from the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and shall serve a two-year term. Following the first chair’s two-year term, the committee shall
 elect a chair from its members to serve a two-year term. A member shall not serve consecutive terms as chair of the committee and the position of chair shall rotate among the members of the committee.

(f) To support the goals of the committee described in subdivision (g) and obtain additional input from other interested stakeholders, the third-party planning facilitator identified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) may engage with the expertise of faculty through existing intersegmental oversight bodies and workgroups, including, but not limited to, the Intersegmental Committee of the Academic Senates, the Intersegmental Curriculum Council, the Intersegmental Coordinating Committee, and the California Intersegmental Articulation Council. The committee shall also use the members designated pursuant to clauses (ix) to (xi),
 inclusive, of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) as liaisons to their respective curriculum workgroups to ensure better coordination and alignment.

(g) On or before December 31, 2023, the committee shall provide the Legislature with recommendations on all of the following issues impeding the scaling of the ADT and streamlining transfer across segments for students:

(1) Identifying annual goals for increasing transfer rates in California and closing racial equity gaps in transfer outcomes to be adopted by the state. Specifically, these goals shall include all of the following:

(A) Annual goals for improving transfer attainment needed to meet the state’s workforce demands.

(B) Goals for closing gaps in transfer outcomes by race.

(C) Goals for closing regional opportunity gaps to access ADT pathways.

(D) Annual goals to meet the statewide degree attainment goal of 70 percent.

(2) Proposing a new unit threshold for STEM degree pathways that meet the requirements for admission to the California State University and the University of California. The recommendations made pursuant to this paragraph shall comply with both of the following requirements:

(A) The recommendations shall include sufficient evidence supporting a higher unit threshold for each STEM degree pathway, including
 an analysis of colleges that have succeeded in adopting similar pathways within the 60-unit framework for lower division units taken at the California Community Colleges.

(B) A recommendation for a differing unit threshold within a STEM degree pathway shall not recommend a change of more than six units.

(3) Reengaging ADT earners who do not transfer or apply for transfer into a four-year postsecondary educational institution.

(h) On or before December 31, 2024, the committee shall achieve all of the following:

(1) Establish timelines and reporting deadlines for the existing regular review of declaring or matching transfer model curricula similar to the California
 State University majors for admissions purposes. In doing this, the committee shall develop a plan to establish reporting and accountability requirements to ensure that transfer model curricula are aligned with the ADT.

(2) Develop a plan for the periodic analysis and creation of additional transfer model curricula for the ADT to respond to evolving workforce demands, including STEM degree pathways, and degree pathways that will aid in the economic recovery from the COVID-19 pandemic, such as nursing and cybersecurity. The plan shall establish venues for professional collaboration in consultation with academic senates and appropriate discipline faculty on degree production, major alignment, and workforce- or industry-specific relevance.

(3) (A) Develop a
 comprehensive communications plan and guidance on student-centered outreach to inform students about the ADT pathway and to ensure prompt and accurate information is communicated across four-year postsecondary educational institutions, the California Community Colleges, and elementary and secondary education.

(B) The plan developed under subparagraph (A) shall include, but not be limited to, guidance to community college counselors and articulation officers on their role in communicating the value of the ADT pathway, guidance to high school counselors on incorporating the ADT pathway into their menu of college options, and templates that can be customized for outreach in local contexts. The communications plan shall also address how updates about the ADT pathways, including new majors and new participating four-year postsecondary
 educational institutions, will be
 communicated to four-year postsecondary educational institutions, the California Community Colleges, and high schools.

(C) The plan developed under subparagraph (A) shall address how updates about the ADT pathway will be regularly communicated to four-year postsecondary educational institutions, the California Community Colleges, and high schools so that counselors, advisers, and student support staff engaged in educating students about their college options, participating four-year postsecondary educational institutions, and degree options, have the most current information about the ADT pathway, and are aware of updates to the program such as new majors or new participating four-year postsecondary educational institutions.

(4) Provide feedback for the regular review and
 identification of updates needed to the ADT internet website maintained by the California Community Colleges to ensure current information and updates are communicated to students, families, and student support staff engaged in educating students about their college options, participating four-year postsecondary educational institutions, and degree options.

(i) On or before April 30, 2026, the committee shall provide the Legislature with both of the following:

(1) Actions taken and milestones achieved by the committee, and any additional recommendations based on the committee’s continued oversight of the ADT and issues impeding streamlining transfer across segments for students.

(2) An update on the progress in
 closing equity gaps by race and ethnicity in transfer outcomes.

(j) (1) On or before May 31, 2023, the Intersegmental Committee of the Academic Senates of the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges shall establish a singular lower division general education pathway that meets the academic requirements necessary for transfer admission to both the California State University and University of California. If the Intersegmental Committee of the Academic Senates of the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges is unable to come to agreement on or before May 31, 2023, the respective administrative bodies of those segments shall establish a singular lower division general education
 pathway that meets the academic requirements necessary for transfer admission to the California State University and the University of California by December 31, 2023.

(2) Commencing with the fall term of the 2025–26 academic year, the singular lower division general education pathway established pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be the only lower division general education pathway used to determine academic eligibility and sufficient academic preparation for transfer admission to the California State University and the University of California.

(3) The singular lower division general education pathway established pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not lengthen the time-to-degree and shall not include more units than is required under the Intersegmental General Education
 Transfer Curriculum on July 31, 2021.

(k) (1) On or before August 1, 2024, where ADTs for major pathways exist, the California Community Colleges shall place students on the ADT pathway if students declare a goal of transfer on their mandatory education plans pursuant to the Seymour-Campbell Student Success Act of 2012 (Article 1 (commencing with Section 78210) of Chapter 2 of Part 48 of Division 7) and such a pathway exists for their intended major, to maximize the probability that students will transfer into a four-year postsecondary educational institution and earn a degree in their
 chosen field of study in a timely manner, and to minimize the accrual of excess units.

(2) A student may opt out of the ADT pathway for a local associate degree or if the student plans to apply to transfer to a University of California campus or an independent institution of higher education defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66010. Each community college shall use their existing processes for student education plans pursuant to the Seymour-Campbell Student Success Act of 2012 (Article 1 (commencing with Section 78210) of Chapter 2 of Part 48 of Division 7) and enrollments to implement the opt-out feature where an ADT exists.

(3) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a student from being on the ADT pathway and also applying to transfer to a University
 of California campus or an independent institution of higher education defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66010.

(4) If an ADT pathway does not exist in the student’s chosen major, then there is no ADT pathway on which to place the student. This subdivision does not apply to students seeking to complete a community college baccalaureate degree program or a career technical education program that does not have an ADT pathway.

(l) Funding appropriated in the Budget Act of 2021 or subsequent budget acts to support the continued implementation of a guided pathways program pursuant to the California Community College Guided Pathways Grant Program established pursuant to Part 54.81 (commencing with Section 88920) of Division 7 may be used by community colleges to implement this
 section. It is the intent of the Legislature that community colleges also prioritize additional funding received in the 2021–22 fiscal year or a subsequent fiscal year to assist students’ success through transfer programs to the extent the activities performed pursuant to this section are not prohibited by the legislative appropriations.

(m) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 566, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 696, Sec. 2.   (AB 2057)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 3 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 696.)
-------------------------------------------

66749.8.

(a) (1) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Student Transfer Achievement Reform Act of 2021.

(2) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(A) “ADT” means associate degree for transfer.

(B) “Four-year postsecondary educational institution” means a campus of the University of California or California State University or an independent institution of higher education defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66010.

(C) “STEM” means science, technology,
 engineering, and mathematics.
